test/en_US_test.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'

# Noun suffixes
SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 s .

# Verb suffixes
SFX V Y 4
SFX V 0 ing .
SFX V 0 s .
SFX V 0 ed .
SFX V y ied y

# Adjective suffixes
SFX J Y 2
SFX J 0 er .
SFX J 0 est .

# Prefixes
PFX P Y 1
PFX re 0 re .

# Compound rules
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDMIN 1
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
