test/en_US_test.dic
1234
hello/AS
world/NS
test/ANM
example
hello/G
world/G
good/J
better/M
best/M
run/GNRS
walk/SGDR
talk/SGDR
speak/SGDR
listen/SGDR
read/SGDR
write/SGDR
learn/SGDR
teach/SGDR
student
teacher
school
university
college
education/G
knowledge
information/R
technology
science
mathematics
physics
chemistry
biology
history
geography
literature
philosophy
psychology
sociology
politics
economics
business
management
marketing
finance
accounting
engineering
medical
legal
health
sport
music
art
culture
travel
food
drink
house
home
family/S
friend
love
peace
freedom
justice
equality
democracy
republic
nation
country
city
town
village
nature
environment
climate
weather
season/S
spring
summer
autumn
winter
morning
afternoon
evening
night
day
week
month
year
time
hour
minute
second
past/S
present
future
